Utah statutes.
64-13d-105.   Restricted powers and duties of contractors.

(1)  A contract for correctional services may not authorize a contractor to perform the following:

(a)  calculate or establish inmate release and parole eligibility dates;

(b)  grant, deny, or revoke sentence credit;

(c)  approve inmates for furlough, work release, or parole; or

(d)  approve the types of work inmates may perform.

(2)  A contractor shall reimburse amounts incurred by local and state agencies for providing assistance with riots, escapes, transportation, medical services, and legal services regarding the operation of the facility.

(3)  A contractor shall have in place a written plan approved by the department regarding the reporting and management of escapes, riots, and other emergency situations.



Enacted by Chapter 288, 1999 General Session

